Wisconsin, session 2025, AB530.
do enact as follows:AB530,11Section 1. 114.045 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 114.045 (1m) (intro.) 2and amended to read:AB530,2,43114.045 (1m) (intro.) No person may operate a drone, as defined in s. 941.292 4(1), over in any of the following manners:AB530,2,95(a) Over a correctional institution, as defined in s. 801.02 (7) (a) 1., including 6any grounds of the institution, except that a person may operate a drone over an 7institution that is a state facility with the express authorization of the secretary of 8corrections or his or her designee or over an institution that is a county facility with 9the express authorization of the sheriff of the county or his or her designee.AB530,210Section 2. 114.045 (1b) of the statutes is created to read:AB530,2,1111114.045 (1b) In this section:AB530,2,1212(a) “Private school” has the meaning given in s. 115.001 (3r).AB530,2,1513(b) “Public protective services agency” means a law enforcement agency, a 14tribal law enforcement agency, or a fire protection or emergency medical services 15agency.AB530,2,1716(c) “Public school” means an elementary or high school. “Public school” 17includes a charter school.AB530,2,1818(d) “School” means a public school, private school, or tribal school.AB530,2,1919(e) “Tribal school” has the meaning given in s. 115.001 (15m).AB530,320Section 3. 114.045 (1m) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB530,2,2221114.045 (1m) (b) Over a property owned by a school or on which a school is 22located, except in any of the following situations:AB530,3,211. With the express authorization of the school board, governing body, or 2governing board having jurisdiction over the school or their designee.AB530,3,532. At the direction of the chief of a public protective services agency having 4jurisdiction over the territory on which the school property is located for any of the 5following purposes:AB530,3,66a. To assist in an active search and rescue operation.AB530,3,77b. To locate an escaped prisoner.AB530,3,88c. To surveil a place or location for the purpose of executing an arrest warrant.AB530,3,119d. When a law enforcement officer has reasonable suspicion to believe that the 10use of a drone is necessary to prevent imminent danger to an individual or to 11prevent imminent destruction of evidence.AB530,412Section 4. 114.045 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB530,3,1413114.045 (2) Any person who violates sub. (1) (1m) may be required to forfeit 14not more than $5,000.AB530,515Section 5. 114.045 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 114.045 (3) (a) and 16amended to read:AB530,3,2117114.045 (3) (a) A law enforcement officer investigating an alleged violation of 18sub. (1) (1m) shall seize and transfer to the department of corrections or authority 19in charge of the correctional institution any photograph, motion picture, other 20visual representation, or data that represents a visual image that was created or 21recorded by a drone during an alleged violation of sub. (1) (1m).AB530,622Section 6. 114.045 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB530,4,323114.045 (3) (b) Items seized under par. (a) shall be, for a violation under sub. 24(1m) (a), transferred to the department of corrections or authority in charge of the 1correctional institution or, for a violation under sub. (1m) (b), transferred to or 2retained by a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the territory on 3which the school property is located.AB530,4,44